Florida, session 2026, SB878.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 483.815, Florida Statutes, is amended to 18 read: 19 483.815âApplication for clinical laboratory personnel 20 license.â 21 (1)âAn application for a clinical laboratory personnel 22 license must shall be made under oath on forms provided by the 23 department and must shall be accompanied by payment of fees as 24 provided by this part. Applicants for licensure must also submit 25 to background screening in accordance with s. 456.0135. A 26 license may be issued authorizing the performance of procedures 27 of one or more categories. 28 (2)âAn applicant who qualifies for licensure under s. 29 483.823(3) or (4) must provide proof of such qualification, 30 submit to background screening in accordance with s. 456.0135, 31 and pay the fees required under s. 483.807 to be eligible for 32 licensure. 33 Section 2.âSubsections (3) and (4) are added to section 34 483.823, Florida Statutes, to read: 35 483.823âQualifications of clinical laboratory personnel.â 36 (3)âExcept as otherwise provided in s. 483.812, a 37 technologist or technician applicant for licensure who satisfies 38 the requirements in 42 C.F.R. s. 493.1489 to perform high 39 complexity testing is deemed to have satisfied the minimum 40 qualifications for licensure under this part to perform high 41 complexity testing as a technologist or technician in this 42 state. 43 (4)âExcept as otherwise provided in s. 483.812, a 44 technician applicant for licensure who satisfies the 45 requirements in 42 C.F.R. s. 493.1423 to perform moderate 46 complexity testing is deemed to have satisfied the minimum 47 qualifications for licensure under this part to perform moderate 48 complexity testing as a technician in this state. 49 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.